Indiana, session 2026, SB229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-32-3-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) Before a person may sign a sales contract to
purchase an interest in a time share unit, the following must occur:
(1) A seller must deliver to the person a document that:
(A) subject to subsections (b) and (c), lists the total of any
fees or expenses associated with:
(i) the purchase of an interest in the time share unit; and
(ii) the ownership of an interest in the time share unit;
and
(B) describes the method by which any fees or expenses
described in clause (A) are calculated.
(2) At least forty-eight (48) hours must have passed since the
seller delivered the document described in subdivision (1).
(b) If a sales contract to purchase an interest in a time share
unit transfers a permanent interest in the time share unit to a
person, the document described in subsection (a) must project the
2026 IN 229—LS 6877/DI 154


total of any fees and expenses described in subsection (a)(1) for
thirty (30) years after the anticipated purchase date.
(c) If a sales contract to purchase an interest in a time share unit
does not transfer a permanent interest in the time share unit to a
person, the document described in subsection (a) must project the
total of any fees and expenses described in subsection (a)(1) for the
entire period of time that the person will have an interest in the
time share unit.
SECTION 2. IC 32-32-3-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) A purchaser has
the right to cancel a camping club membership or time share purchase
within seventy-two (72) hours fourteen (14) days after the execution
of the sales contract, excluding Sundays and legal holidays as set forth
in IC 1-1-9-1. The right of cancellation shall be set forth conspicuously
in boldface type on the first page of any time share instrument or
camping club membership agreement and immediately above the
signature of the purchaser on any sales contract. In each case, the
cancellation clause must include an explanation of the conditions and
manner of exercise of the cancellation right. The right of cancellation
may not be waivable by any purchaser. The developer shall furnish to
each purchaser a form, as prescribed by the agency, for the exercise of
the right.
(b) To cancel a camping club membership or time share purchase,
a consumer must give notice of cancellation by mail or telegraphic
communication or as otherwise allowed by this subsection. The notice
is effective on the date postmarked or when transmitted from the place
of origin. Any written notice of cancellation delivered other than by
mail or telegraph is effective at the time of delivery at the place of
business of the developer or escrow agent designated in the form of
notice of cancellation.
SECTION 3. IC 33-42-13-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2019,
SECTION 22, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A commission as a notary public does not
allow a person to do the following:
(1) Provide legal advice or otherwise practice law.
(2) Act as an immigration consultant or provide advice on
immigration matters.
(3) Represent a person in an administrative or judicial proceeding
related to citizenship or immigration.
(4) Use an initial or name, other than the initial or name under
which the notary public has been commissioned, to sign an
acknowledgment.
2026 IN 229—LS 6877/DI 154


(5) Take an acknowledgment or administer an oath to any person
the notary public knows at the time to be:
(A) adjudicated mentally incompetent; or
(B) under a guardianship described in IC 29-3.
(6) Take an acknowledgment from any person who is blind
without first reading the record to the person who is blind.
(7) Take the acknowledgment of any person who does not speak
or understand the English language unless the nature and effect
of the record is translated into a language the person speaks or
understands.
(8) Take the acknowledgment of a record without witnessing a
signature or receiving an acknowledgment from the principal that
the signature is authentic.
(9) Take a verification of an affidavit or oath in the absence of an
affirmation of truth by the affiant.
(10) Perform a notarial act for:
(A) oneself;
(B) one's spouse; or
(C) any party;
that may directly benefit a person described in clause (A) or (B).
(11) Perform a notarial act for a transaction when the notary
public is an:
(A) interest holder (as defined in IC 23-0.5-1.5-17); or
(B) officer, director, manager, or other agent;
of a party to the transaction.
(b) A notary public may not engage in false or deceptive advertising.
(c) A notary public, other than an attorney licensed to practice law
in Indiana, may not use the term "notario" or "notario publico".
(d) Except as provided in subsection (g), a notary public may not
advertise or represent that the notary public can draft legal documents,
provide legal advice, or otherwise practice law. Any notary public who
advertises notarial services shall include the following statement in
each advertisement:
"I am not an attorney licensed to practice law in Indiana. I am not
allowed to draft legal records, give advice on legal matters,
including immigration, or charge a fee for those activities.".
(e) The statement described in subsection (d) shall be translated into
every language used in an advertisement.
(f) If size or space restrictions make it impossible for the statement
to be incorporated into an advertisement, the statement described in
subsection (d) shall be prominently displayed at the site where the
notarial act is performed. A display described in this subsection must
2026 IN 229—LS 6877/DI 154


be shown before the performance of a notarial act.
(g) Subsections (c) through (f) do not apply to a notary public who
is licensed to practice law in Indiana.
(h) Unless otherwise permitted by law, a notary public may not
withhold access to or possession of an original record provided by a
person seeking the performance of a notarial act by a notary public.
(i) A notary public who violates this chapter may have the notary
public's commission revoked by a judge with jurisdiction in the county
in which the notary public resides or is primarily employed.
(j) A notary public whose commission has been revoked may not
reapply for a new commission until five (5) years after the revocation.
(k) A notary public who has been convicted of notario publico
deception under section 4 of this chapter may not reapply for a new
commission.
(l) If the secretary of state revokes the commission of a notary
public, the notary public may not reapply for a new commission for five
(5) years.
(m) A notary public may not perform a notarial act when the notary
public's commission is suspended or revoked.
2026 IN 229—LS 6877/DI 154